Hawaii, session 2025, HB715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 338, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§338-     Certificates of stillbirth.  (a)  The department of health shall, upon the request of the parent or parents, issue a certificate of stillbirth to the parent or parents named on a fetal death certificate issued in the case of a stillbirth.  A certificate may be requested and issued regardless of the date on which the fetal death certificate was issued.  The certificate shall, upon the request of the parent or parents, include the name given to the stillborn fetus. (b)  For purposes of this section, "stillbirth" means the unintended intrauterine death of a fetus that occurs after the clinical estimate of the twentieth week of gestation." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of health to modify the fetal death reporting system, certificate ordering system, and retaining of personnel necessary to implement this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________